Utah statutes.
32B-8a-203.   Operational requirements for transferee.

(1)  A transferee shall begin operations of the retail license within 30 days from the day on which a transfer is approved by the commission, except that the department may grant an extension of this time period not to exceed 30 days.

(2)  If a transferee fails to begin operations of the retail license within the time period required by Subsection (1), the retail license is forfeited and the commission may issue the retail license to another person.

(3)  A transferee shall begin operations of the retail license at the location to which the transfer applies before the transferee may seek a transfer of the retail license to a different location.

